Utah statutes.
63L-3-201.   State agencies to adopt guidelines.

(1)  Each state agency shall adopt guidelines to assist them in the identification of actions that have constitutional taking implications.

(2)  In creating the guidelines, the state agency shall take into consideration recent court rulings on the taking of private property.

(3)  Each state agency shall complete the guidelines on or before January 1, 1999, and review and update the guidelines annually to maintain consistency with court rulings.

